Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 8
VEHICLE BOOTING COMPANIES

40-10.1-801. Permit requirements - rules.

Effective January 1, 2020, a person shall not operate or offer to operate as a vehicle booting company in intrastate commerce without first having obtained a permit from the commission in accordance with this article 10.1.

A person may apply for a permit under this part 8 to the commission in the form and with the information as the commission requires. Permits are valid for one year after the date of issuance.

The commission may deny an application under this part 8 of a person who has, within the immediately preceding five years, been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony. The commission may also deny an application under this part 8 or refuse to renew the permit of a vehicle booting company based upon a determination that the vehicle booting company or any of its owners, principals, officers, members, partners, or directors has not satisfied a civil penalty arising out of any administrative or enforcement action brought by the commission.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 40-10.1-112 (4), the commission shall issue a permit to a vehicle booting company upon completion of the application and the filing of proof of workers' compensation insurance coverage in accordance with the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", articles 40 to 47 of title 8, and with the financial responsibility requirements of this title 40 and may attach to the permit and to the exercise of the rights granted by the permit any restrictions, terms, and conditions, including altering the rates and charges of the applicant, as are reasonably deemed necessary for the protection of the property of the public.

If a vehicle booting company violates this article 10.1, any other applicable provision of law, or any rule or order of the commission issued under this article 10.1 and as a result is ordered by a court or by the commission to pay a fine or civil penalty that the vehicle booting company subsequently fails to pay in full within the time prescribed for payment, and not before the decision imposing the fine or civil penalty becomes a final decision by the commission, then:

The vehicle booting company's permit is revoked immediately; and

The vehicle booting company, its owners, principals, officers, members, partners, and directors, and any other entity owned or operated by one or more of those owners, principals, officers, members, partners, or directors, may be disqualified from obtaining or renewing any operating authority under this title 40 for a period of five years after the date on which the fine or civil penalty was due. The period of disqualification pursuant to this subsection (3)(b)(II) is in addition to, and not in lieu of, and does not affect, any other penalty or period of disqualification, including the period of disqualification specified in section 40-10.1-112 (4).

A vehicle booting company's facilities and vehicles are subject to inspection by the commission and by authorized personnel of the Colorado state patrol, which agency shall promptly report to the commission concerning any violations revealed by an inspection.

The commission may promulgate rules as necessary and reasonable to implement this part 8, including rules regarding signage and drop fees.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the vehicle booting cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", consisting of any fee revenue collected by the commission pursuant to this part 8 and transmitted to the state treasurer for credit into the fund and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the commission for its implementation of this part 8. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3314, § 21, effective May 30.